Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.480

Disposition of moneys.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all moneys collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid to the director and deposited in an account within the agricultural local fund. Such deposits shall be used only in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(2) Moneys collected under RCW 15.54.474 shall be deposited in the general fund.

[ 1998 c 36 s 13; 1988 c 254 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 257 s 11; 1967 ex.s. c 22 s 36.]

NOTES:

Short title—1998 c 36: See note following RCW 15.54.265.

Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 257: See note following RCW 15.13.470.